test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex-der-jotteed_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - jotteeđ: # checked

    jotteeđ+V+Inf: jotteeđ
    jotteeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Inf: juttuđ
    jotteeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: juttuum
    jotteeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: juttuuh
    jotteeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jottoo
    jotteeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: jottojeen
    jotteeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: juttuuvettee
    jotteeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: juttuv
    jotteeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: juttup
    jotteeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: juttuuvetteđ
    jotteeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: jottojeh
    jotteeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: jottojim
    jotteeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: jottojih
    jotteeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: juttui
    jotteeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: juttuim
    jotteeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: juttuid
    jotteeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: juttuin
    jotteeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: juttuim
    jotteeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: juttuid
    jotteeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: jottojii
    jotteeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: juttuuččim
    jotteeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: juttuuččih
    jotteeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: juttuuččij
    jotteeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: juttuuččáim
    jotteeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: juttuuččáid
    jotteeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: juttuuččáin
    jotteeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: juttuuččijm
    jotteeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: juttuuččijd
    jotteeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: juttuuččii
#    jotteeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: juttuužeem
#    jotteeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: juttuužeeh
##    jotteeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: juttuš
#    jotteeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: juttuužeen
#    jotteeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: juttušvettee
#    jotteeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: juttuužává
#    jotteeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: juttuužep
#    jotteeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: juttušvetteđ
#    jotteeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: juttuužeh
    jotteeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: juttuu
    jotteeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: juttum
    jotteeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: juttuuččii
#    jotteeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: juttuužii
    jotteeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+PrsPrc: [jottojeijee, jottojijjee] # theoretical
    jotteeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+PrfPrc: [juttum, juutum] #Lene added juutum
    jotteeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Nom: juttum
    jotteeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Ess: juttuumin
    jotteeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Loc: juttuumist
    jotteeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Ill: juttuumân
    jotteeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ger: juttuudijn
    jotteeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+VAbess: juttuuhánnáá
    jotteeđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jođedâm
    jotteeđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: jođedah
    jotteeđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: joođeed
    jotteeđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: jođedeen
    jotteeđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: joođeedvettee
    jotteeđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: jođedává
    jotteeđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: jođedeh
    jotteeđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: joođeed
    jotteeđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: jođedim
    jotteeđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: jođedij
    jotteeđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: jođedii
    jotteeđ+V+Der/d+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: jođediččim
    jotteeđ+V+Der/d+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: jođedičij
    jotteeđ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: jođedižžeem
    jotteeđ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: jođediš
    jotteeđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: joođeed
    jotteeđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: jođedâm
    jotteeđ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: jođedižžii
    jotteeđ+V+Der/d+V+PrfPrc: jođedâm
    jotteeđ+V+Der/d+V+VAbess: joođeedhánnáá
    jotteeđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Nom: jođedem
    jotteeđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Ill: joođeedmân
    jotteeđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Ess: joođeedmin
    jotteeđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Loc: joođeedmist
    jotteeđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com: joođeeddijn
    jotteeđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com+PxSg1: joođeeddijnân
    jotteeđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com+PxSg2: joođeeddijnâd
    jotteeđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com+PxSg3: joođeeddijnis
    jotteeđ+V+Der/d+V+Ger: joođeeddijn
    jotteeđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jođestâm
    jotteeđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jođettâm
    jotteeđ+V+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jođeškuáđám
    jotteeđ+V+Der/l+V+Inf: jutâliđ
    jotteeđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jutâlâm
    jotteeđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: juuttâl
    jotteeđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: jutâleen
    jotteeđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: jutâleh
    jotteeđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: juuttâl
    jotteeđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: jutâlim
    jotteeđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: jutâlij
    jotteeđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: jutâlii

  Verb - anneeđ: # MLO, checked

    anneeđ+V+Inf: anneeđ
    anneeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: onnuum
    anneeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: onnuuh
    anneeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: annoo
    anneeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: annojeen
    anneeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: onnuv
    anneeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: onnup
    anneeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: annojeh
    anneeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: onnuu
    anneeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: annojim
    anneeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: onnui
    anneeđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: annojii
